District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0749.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Wealth Proceeds Tax Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2. Chapter 18 of Title 47 (D.C. Official Code §§ 47-1801 et seq.) of the District of
Columbia Official Code is amended as follows:
“(a) The table of contents is amended by inserting a new line to read as follows:
“§ 47-1806.03a. Wealth Proceeds Tax.”.
“(b) A new Section 47-1806.03a is added to read as follows:
“§ 47-1806.03a. Wealth Proceeds Tax.”.
“(a) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:
“(1) “District modified adjusted gross income” means federal modified adjusted
gross income, subject to the adjustments set forth in § 47-1803.02(a)(1)(B)(ii).
“(2) The term “federal modified adjusted gross income” shall have the same
meaning as set forth in section 1411(d) of the Internal Revenue Code, subject to the following
adjustments:


“(A) Interest on U.S. obligations that District is prohibited from taxing
under federal law shall be excluded; and
“(B) Interest on obligations issued by state and local governments other
than the District shall be included.
“(3) “Threshold amount” means:
“(A) in the case of married individuals or registered domestic partners
filing separately on a combined return, $500,000 divided evenly among the taxpayers;
“(B) in the case of married individuals, registered domestic partners, or a
qualifying surviving spouse filing a joint return, $500,000;
“(C) in the case of married individuals or registered domestic partners
filing a separate return, $250,000; and
“(D) in the case of all other taxpayers filing a return, $400,000, except that
in the case of a fiduciary making a return on behalf of an estate or trust pursuant to § 47-1809.03,
$16,000.
“(4) The term “wealth proceeds” shall have the same meaning as “net investment
income” that is set forth in section 1411(c) of the Internal Revenue Code, subject to the
following adjustments:
“(A) Interest on U.S. obligations that District is prohibited from taxing
under federal law shall be excluded;
“(B) Interest on obligations issued by state and local governments other
than the District shall be included; and
“(C) Income of an incomplete gift non-grantor trust, less any deductions of
the trust, to the extent such wealth proceeds and deductions of such trust would be taken into


account in computing the taxpayer’s federal taxable income if such trust in its entirety were
treated as a grantor trust for federal tax purposes shall be included for a taxpayer who transferred
property to an incomplete gift non-grantor trust.
“(5) The term “incomplete gift non-grantor trust” means a resident trust that meets
the following conditions:
“(A) The trust does not qualify as a grantor trust under sections 671
through 679 of the Internal Revenue Code, and
“(B) The grantor's transfer of assets to the trust is treated as an incomplete
gift under section 2511 of the Internal Revenue Code, and the regulations thereunder.
“(b) In the case of an individual, estate, or trust there is hereby imposed (in addition to
any other tax imposed) for each taxable year beginning after December 31, 2025, a tax equal to 3
percent of the lesser of:
“(1) Wealth proceeds for such taxable year, or
“(2) Federal modified adjusted gross income for such taxable year, less the
threshold amount.
“(c) For an individual who is not a resident of the District for the entire taxable year, the
tax under this subsection must be calculated as if the individual is a resident of the District for
the entire year, and that amount must be multiplied by a fraction in which:
“(1) The numerator is wealth proceeds allocable under § 47–1806.01 to the
District, and
“(2) The denominator is the total amount of wealth proceeds for the taxable year.
“(d) For an estate or trust, the tax under this section must be calculated by multiplying the
wealth proceeds tax liability by a fraction, the numerator of which is the amount of the estate or


trust’s wealth proceeds allocated to the state pursuant to the provisions of sections § 47-1809.03,
and the denominator of which is the taxpayer’s total wealth proceeds.
“(e) All references to the Internal Revenue Code in this section shall refer to the code in
effect as of January 1, 2026.”.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect after approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional review as
provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of
Columbia Register.